Maryland, session 2025, HB0405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0405*

HOUSE BILL 405
19–214.2.
(a) (1) Each hospital annually shall submit to the Commission:
(i) At times prescribed by the Commission, the hospital’s policy on
the collection of debts owed by patients; and
(ii) A report including:
1. The total number of patients by race or ethnicity, gender,
and zip code of residence against whom the hospital, or a debt collector used by the hospital,
filed an action to collect a debt owed on a hospital bill;
2. The total number of patients by race or ethnicity, gender,
and zip code of residence with respect to whom the hospital has and has not reported or
classified a bad debt; and
3. The total dollar amount of the charges for hospital services
provided to patients but not collected by the hospital for patients covered by insurance,
including the out–of–pocket costs for patients covered by insurance, and patients without
insurance.
(2) The Commission shall post the information submitted under paragraph
(1) of this subsection on its website.
(b) The policy submitted under subsection (a)(1) of this section shall:
(1) Provide for active oversight by the hospital of any contract for collection
of debts on behalf of the hospital;
(2) [Prohibit] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (M) OF THIS
SECTION, PROHIBIT the hospital from selling any debt;
(3) Prohibit the charging of interest on bills incurred by self–pay patients
before a court judgment is obtained;
(4) Describe in detail the consideration by the hospital of patient income,
assets, and other criteria;
(5) Prohibit the hospital from reporting to a consumer reporting agency or
filing a civil action to collect a debt within 180 days after the initial bill is provided;
(6) Describe the hospital’s procedures for collecting a debt;
(7) Describe the circumstances in which the hospital will seek a judgment
against a patient;

HOUSE BILL 405 3
(8) In accordance with subsection (c) of this section, provide for a refund of
amounts collected from a patient or the guarantor of a patient who was later found to be
eligible for free care within 240 days after the initial bill was provided;
(9) If the hospital has obtained a judgment against or reported adverse
information to a consumer reporting agency about a patient who later was found to be
eligible for free care within 240 days after the initial bill was provided for which the
judgment was awarded or the adverse information was reported, require the hospital to
seek to vacate the judgment or strike the adverse information;
(10) Provide a mechanism for a patient to:
(i) Request the hospital to reconsider the denial of free or
reduced–cost care;
(ii) File with the hospital a complaint against the hospital or a debt
collector used by the hospital regarding the handling of the patient’s bill; and
(iii) Allow the patient and the hospital to mutually agree to modify
the terms of a payment plan offered under subsection (e) of this section or entered into with
the patient; and
(11) Prohibit the hospital from collecting additional fees in an amount that
exceeds the approved charge for the hospital service as established by the Commission for
which the medical debt is owed on a bill for a patient who is eligible for free or
reduced–cost care under the hospital’s financial assistance policy.
(M) (1) (I) A HOSPITAL MAY SELL DEBT OWED TO THE HOSPITAL BY A
PATIENT FOR HOSPITAL SERVICES TO PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY FOR THE SOLE
PURPOSE OF CANCELING THE DEBT.
(II) THE CONTRACT BETWEEN THE HOSPITAL AND PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY SHALL STATE THAT THE SOLE PURPOSE OF THE SALE OF THE
DEBT IS TO CANCEL THE DEBT.
(III) THE PATIENT IS NOT RESPONSIBLE TO THE HOSPITAL OR
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY FOR ANY AMOUNT OF THE DEBT THAT IS SOLD UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION OR ANY INTEREST, FEES, OR COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE DEBT
OR THE SALE.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL TREAT THE AMOUNTS OF PAYMENTS TO
HOSPITALS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AS AN OFFSET TO UNCOMPENSATED CARE
AMOUNTS REPORTED BY HOSPITALS.

HOUSE BILL 405
(3) IF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY CANCELS A PATIENT’S DEBT
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY SHALL NOTIFY THE PATIENT
THAT THE DEBT HAS BEEN CANCELED.
[(m)] (N) The Commission shall review each hospital’s implementation of and
compliance with the hospital’s policies and the requirements of this section.
[(n)] (O) (1) On or before February 1 each year, beginning in 2023, the
Commission shall compile the information required under subsection (a) of this section and
prepare a medical debt collection report based on the compiled information.
(2) The report required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be:
(i) Made available to the public free of charge; and
(ii) Submitted to the Senate Finance Committee and the House
Health and Government Operations Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.